District of Columbia statutes.
9-912

Pledge of funds.

All monies received pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds, as revenues, or as grants, appropriations, or other funds provided by federal, state, or local governments, may be pledged to the payment of bonds issued by the Authority and, if so pledged, shall be considered to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this chapter.

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-67, § 13, 32 DCR 6093

History

1981 Ed., § 7-1262.

Prior Codifications